Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
BOARD OF DIRECTORS

7-108-101. Requirement for board of directors.

Except as otherwise provided in its articles of incorporation, each corporation shall have a board of directors.

Subject to any provision stated in the articles of incorporation, all corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of, the board of directors or such other persons as the articles of incorporation provide shall have the authority and perform the duties of a board of directors.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 778, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2319, § 238, effective July 1, 2004.

7-108-102. Qualifications of directors.

A director shall be an individual who is eighteen years of age or older. The bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this state or a shareholder unless the bylaws so prescribe.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 778, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1497, § 251, effective July 1.

7-108-103. Number and election of directors.

A board of directors shall consist of one or more members, with the number stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

The bylaws may establish a range for the size of the board of directors by fixing a minimum and maximum number of directors. If a range is established, the number of directors may be fixed or changed from time to time within the range by the shareholders or the board of directors.

Directors are elected at each annual meeting of the shareholders except as provided in section 7-108-106.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 778, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2319, § 239, effective July 1, 2004.

7-108-104. Election of directors by certain classes of shareholders.

If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the shares of the corporation into classes or series, the articles of incorporation may authorize the election of all or a stated number or portion of directors by the holders of one or more authorized classes or series of shares. A class or series of shares entitled to elect one or more directors is a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 779, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2319, § 240, effective July 1, 2004.

7-108-105. Terms of directors generally.

Except as provided in section 7-108-106, the terms of the initial directors of a corporation expire at the first shareholders' meeting at which directors are elected.

Except as provided in section 7-108-106, the terms of all other directors expire at the next annual shareholders' meeting following their election.

A decrease in the number of directors does not shorten an incumbent director's term.

The term of a director elected to fill a vacancy pursuant to section 7-108-110 (1)(b) or 7-108-110 (1)(c) expires at the next annual shareholders' meeting at which directors are elected. The term of a director elected to fill a vacancy pursuant to section 7-108-110 (1)(a) shall be the unexpired term of the director's predecessor in office; except that, if the director's predecessor had been elected to fill a vacancy pursuant to section 7-108-110 (1)(b) or 7-108-110 (1)(c), the term of a director elected pursuant to section 7-108-110 (1)(a) shall be the unexpired term of the last predecessor elected by the shareholders.

Despite the expiration of the director's term, a director continues to serve until the director's successor is elected and qualifies.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1497, § 252, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 779, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

(6) amended, p. 978, § 55, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(6) amended, p. 1848, § 110, effective July 1; (6) amended, p. 1712, § 110, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

(4), (5), and (6) amended, p. 1497, § 252, effective July 1.

7-108-106. Staggered terms for directors.

The articles of incorporation may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into two or three groups, with each group containing one-half or one-third of the total, as near as may be. In that event, the terms of directors in the first group expire at the first annual shareholders' meeting after their election, the terms of directors in the second group expire at the second annual shareholders' meeting after their election, and the terms of directors in the third group, if any, expire at the third annual shareholders' meeting after their election. Upon the expiration of the initial staggered terms, directors shall be elected for terms of two years or three years, as the case may be, to succeed those whose terms expire.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 779, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-108-107. Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by giving notice of resignation to the corporation.

A resignation of a director is effective when the notice is received by the corporation unless the notice states a later effective date.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 780, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 978, § 56, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1848, § 111, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1713, § 111, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2319, § 241, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(3) repealed, p. 1498, § 253, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 169, § 17, effective April 19.

7-108-108. Removal of directors by shareholders.

The shareholders may remove one or more directors with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group may participate in the vote to remove that director.

A director may be removed only if the number of votes cast in favor of removal exceeds the number of votes cast against removal; except that, if cumulative voting is in effect, a director may not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting is voted against such removal.

A director may be removed by the shareholders only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director, and the meeting notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1498, § 254, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 780, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

(5) amended, p. 978, § 57, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 1848, § 112, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1713, § 112, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 1498, § 254, effective July 1.

7-108-109. Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

A director may be removed by the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the corporation's principal office is located or, if the corporation has no principal office in this state, by the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the corporation has no registered agent, by the district court for the city and county of Denver, in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or by shareholders holding at least ten percent of the outstanding shares of any class, if the court finds that the director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct or gross abuse of authority or discretion with respect to the corporation and that removal is in the best interests of the corporation.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

If shareholders commence a proceeding under subsection (1) of this section, they shall make the corporation a party defendant.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 780, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1318, § 21, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(4) amended, p. 978, § 58, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 1848, § 113, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 1713, § 113, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2319, § 242, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(4) repealed, p. 1498, § 255, effective July 1.

7-108-110. Vacancy on board.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:

The shareholders may fill the vacancy;

The board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

If the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, if the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of shareholders:

If one or more of the remaining directors were elected by the same voting group, only such directors are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by directors, and they may do so by the affirmative vote of a majority of such directors remaining in office; and

Only the holders of shares of that voting group are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the shareholders.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date, by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under section 7-108-107 (2) or otherwise, may be filled before the vacancy occurs, but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 781, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-108-111. Compensation of directors.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 781, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.